apertium-deu.deu.dix
<pardef n="teu/er__adj-positive">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rem</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="st"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rem</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="st"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="st"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="st"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sw"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sw"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sw"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rer</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="st"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rer</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="st"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rer</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="st"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rer</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>res</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>res</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="teu/er__adj">
  <e>       <par n="teu/er__adj-positive"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r>er</r></p><par n="abenteuerlich__adj-comp"/></e>
  <e>       <i>er</i><par n="abenteuerlich__adj-sup"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/viel__adj">
  <e>       <i>viel</i><par n="abendfüllend__adj-positive"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mehr</l>      <r>viel</r></p><par n="abenteuerlich__adj-comp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mei</l>       <r>viel</r></p><par n="abenteuerlich__adj-sup"/></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="nipt__adj-positive">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="st"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="st"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="st"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="st"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sw"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sw"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sw"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="st"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="st"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="st"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="mix"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="nipt__adj">    <!-- TODO: check correctness -->
  <e>       <par n="nipt__adj-positive"/></e>
</pardef>


<!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

<pardef n="ein__num">     <!-- FIXME -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="zwei__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="null">            <i>null</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="ein">             <i>ein</i><par n="ein__num"/></e>
<e lm="zwei">            <i>zwei</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="drei">            <i>drei</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="vier">            <i>vier</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="fünf">            <i>fünf</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="sechs">           <i>sechs</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="sieben">          <i>sieben</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="acht">            <i>acht</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="neun">            <i>neun</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="zehn">            <i>zehn</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="elf">             <i>elf</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="zwölf">           <i>zwölf</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="dreizehn">        <i>dreizehn</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="vierzehn">        <i>vierzehn</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="fünfzehn">        <i>fünfzehn</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="sechzehn">        <i>sechzehn</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="siebzehn">        <i>siebzehn</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="achtzehn">        <i>achtzehn</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="neunzehn">        <i>neunzehn</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="zwanzig">         <i>zwanzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="einundzwanzig">   <i>einundzwanzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="zweiundzwanzig">  <i>zweiundzwanzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="dreiundzwanzig">  <i>dreiundzwanzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="vierundzwanzig">  <i>vierundzwanzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="fünfundzwanzig">  <i>fünfundzwanzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="sechsundzwanzig"> <i>sechsundzwanzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="siebenundzwanzig"><i>siebenundzwanzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="achtundzwanzig">  <i>achtundzwanzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="neunundzwanzig">  <i>neunundzwanzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="dreißig">         <i>dreißig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="einunddreißig">   <i>einunddreißig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="zweiunddreißig">  <i>zweiunddreißig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="dreiunddreißig">  <i>dreiunddreißig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="vierunddreißig">  <i>vierunddreißig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="fünfunddreißig">  <i>fünfunddreißig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="sechsunddreißig"> <i>sechsunddreißig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="siebenunddreißig"><i>siebenunddreißig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="achtunddreißig">  <i>achtunddreißig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="neununddreißig">  <i>neununddreißig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="vierzig">         <i>vierzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="einundvierzig">   <i>einundvierzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="zweiundvierzig">  <i>zweiundvierzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="dreiundvierzig">  <i>dreiundvierzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="vierundvierzig">  <i>vierundvierzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="fünfundvierzig">  <i>fünfundvierzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="sechsundvierzig"> <i>sechsundvierzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="siebenundvierzig"><i>siebenundvierzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="achtundvierzig">  <i>achtundvierzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="neunundvierzig">  <i>neunundvierzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="fünfzig">         <i>fünfzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="Million">         <i>Million</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="II">              <i>II</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="III">             <i>III</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="IV">              <i>IV</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="IX">              <i>IX</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="VI">              <i>VI</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="V">               <i>V</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="VII">             <i>VII</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="VIII">            <i>VIII</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="X">               <i>X</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="XI">              <i>XI</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="XII">             <i>XII</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIII">            <i>XIII</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIV">             <i>XIV</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIX">             <i>XIX</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="XV">              <i>XV</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVI">             <i>XVI</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVII">            <i>XVII</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVIII">           <i>XVIII</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="XX">              <i>XX</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="XXI">             <i>XXI</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="XXII">            <i>XXII</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
<e lm="ander">           <i>ander</i><par n="nipt__adj"/></e>
<e lm="teuer">           <i>teu</i><par n="teu/er__adj"/></e>
<e lm="viel">            <i></i><par n="/viel__adj"/></e>
